Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,172
Scleral tattooing; prohibited acts; civil penalty.

(1) For purposes of this section, scleral tattooing means the practice of using needles, scalpels, or other related equipment to produce an indelible mark or figure on the human eye by scarring or inserting a pigment on, in, or under:

(a) The fornix conjunctiva;

(b) The bulbar conjunctiva;

(c) The ocular conjunctiva; or

(d) Another ocular surface.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person shall not perform or offer to perform scleral tattooing on another person.

(3) This section does not apply to a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act when the licensee is performing a procedure within the scope of her or his practice.

(4) In addition to the remedies authorized in section 38-140 or 38-1,124, a person who performs scleral tattooing without being authorized to do so under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation. If a violation continues after notification, this constitutes a separate offense. The civil penalties shall be assessed in a civil action brought for such purpose by the Attorney General in the district court of the county in which the violation occurred. Any civil penalty assessed and unpaid under this section shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property. The department may also collect in such action attorney's fees and costs incurred in the collection of the civil penalty. The department shall, within thirty days after receipt, transmit any collected civil penalty to the State Treasurer to be disposed of in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2019, LB449, § 4.